Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.150

Power of attorney provisions relieving agent liability—When allowed.

A provision in a power of attorney relieving an agent of liability for breach of duty is binding on the principal and the principal's successors in interest except to the extent the provision:

(1) Relieves the agent of liability for breach of duty committed dishonestly, with an improper motive, or with gross negligence to the purposes of the power of attorney or the best interest of the principal; or

(2) Was inserted as a result of an abuse of a confidential or fiduciary relationship with the principal.

[ 2016 c 209 s 115.]